Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.50.860

Faculty tenure—Tenure retained upon administrative appointment.

A tenured faculty member, upon appointment to an administrative appointment shall be allowed to retain his or her tenure.

[ 2011 c 336 s 742; 1977 ex.s. c 282 s 7; 1969 ex.s. c 283 s 38. Formerly RCW 28.85.860.]

NOTES:

Severability—1977 ex.s. c 282: See note following RCW 28B.50.870.

Severability—1969 ex.s. c 283: See note following RCW 28A.150.050.